Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,312
Real-time nitrate sensors; legislative intent to appropriate.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million dollars for fiscal year 2024-25 from the General Fund to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment to fund the installation of real-time nitrate sensors in monitoring wells statewide to prioritize nitrate management and reduction.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 104;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 448.